Iowa, session 2025-2026, 1413XD.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF IOWA:
TLSB 1413XD (4) 91
ss/ns

S.F. _____ H.F. _____
Section 1. Section 9E.6, subsection 3, paragraph b,
subparagraph (1), Code 2025, is amended to read as follows:
(1) The state commissioner of elections shall, upon
the written request of a party to the contest, certify the
eligibility of a program participant to vote or the validity
of a program participant’s absentee ballot. A written request
submitted under this paragraph “b” must contain the voter
voter’s four-digit personal identification number affixed to
the program participant’s absentee ballot.
Sec. 2. Section 39.2, subsection 1, paragraph a, Code 2025,
is amended to read as follows:
a. All special elections which are authorized or required
by law, unless the applicable law otherwise requires, shall
be held on Tuesday. A special election shall not be held on
the first, second, third, and fourth Tuesdays preceding and
following the primary and the general elections or on the
first, second, and third Tuesdays preceding and following a
city or school election.
Sec. 3. Section 43.49, subsection 1, unnumbered paragraph
1, Code 2025, is amended to read as follows:
On the Monday or Tuesday following the primary election, the
board of supervisors shall meet, open, and canvass the returns
from each voting precinct in the county, and make abstracts
thereof, stating the following:
Sec. 4. Section 46.24, subsection 1, Code 2025, is amended
to read as follows:
1. A judge of the supreme court, court of appeals, or
district court including a district associate judge, full-time
associate juvenile judge, or full-time associate probate judge,
or a clerk of the district court must receive more affirmative
than negative votes to be retained in office. When the poll
is closed, the election judges shall publicly canvass the vote
forthwith. The board of supervisors shall canvass the returns
on the Monday or Tuesday after the election, and shall promptly
certify the number of affirmative and negative votes on each
LSB 1413XD (4) 91
-1- ss/ns 1/9

S.F. _____ H.F. _____
judge or clerk to the state commissioner of elections.
Sec. 5. Section 48A.26A, subsection 2, Code 2025, is amended
to read as follows:
2. If the acknowledgment is returned as undeliverable by
the postal service, the commissioner shall attempt to contact
the voter by forwardable mail. If a response is not received
from the voter within fourteen days after the notice is mailed,
the commissioner shall change the status of the registration
to inactive status and shall immediately notify the state
registrar of voters, the county sheriff, and the county
attorney.
Sec. 6. Section 48A.37, subsection 1, Code 2025, is amended
to read as follows:
1. Voter registration records, including voter registration
forms, shall be maintained in an electronic medium on the
statewide voter registration system. A history of local
election participation shall be maintained as part of the
electronic record for at least two general, primary, school,
and city elections. Absentee voting shall be recorded for
the previous two general and primary elections. After each
election, the county commissioner shall update telephone
numbers provided by registered voters pursuant to section
49.77.
Sec. 7. Section 50.9, Code 2025, is amended to read as
follows:
50.9 Return of ballots not voted.
Ballots not voted, or spoiled by voters while attempting
to vote, shall be returned by the precinct election officials
to the commissioner, and a receipt taken for the ballots.
The spoiled ballots shall be preserved for twenty-two months
following elections for federal offices and for six months
following elections for all other offices. The commissioner
shall record the number of ballots sent to the polling places
but not voted. The ballots not voted shall be destroyed after
the end of the period for contesting the election. However,
LSB 1413XD (4) 91
-2- ss/ns 2/9

S.F. _____ H.F. _____
if a contest is requested, the ballots not voted shall be
preserved until the election contest is concluded.
Sec. 8. Section 50.11, subsection 2, Code 2025, is amended
by striking the subsection.
Sec. 9. Section 50.12, Code 2025, is amended to read as
follows:
50.12 Return and preservation of ballots.
Immediately after making the proclamation, and before
separating, the board members of each precinct in which votes
have been received by paper ballot shall enclose in an envelope
or other container all ballots which have been counted by them,
except those endorsed “Rejected as double”, “Defective”, or
“Objected to”, and securely seal the envelope. The signatures
of all board members of the precinct shall be placed across
the seal or the opening of the container so that it cannot
be opened without breaking the seal. The precinct election
officials shall return all the ballots to the commissioner,
who shall carefully preserve them for six twenty-two months.
Ballots from elections for federal offices shall be preserved
for twenty-two months. The sealed packages containing voted
ballots shall be opened only for an official recount authorized
by section 50.48, 50.49, or 50.50, for an election contest
held pursuant to chapters 57 through 62, to conduct an audit
pursuant to section 50.51, or to destroy the ballots pursuant
to section 50.19.
Sec. 10. Section 50.19, subsection 1, Code 2025, is amended
to read as follows:
1. The commissioner may destroy precinct election
registers, the declarations of eligibility signed by voters,
and other material pertaining to any election in which federal
offices are not on the ballot, except the tally lists and
abstracts of votes which have not been electronically recorded,
six twenty-two months after the election if a contest is not
pending. If a contest is pending, all election materials shall
be preserved until final determination of the contest or until
LSB 1413XD (4) 91
-3- ss/ns 3/9

S.F. _____ H.F. _____
twenty-two months after the election, whichever is later.
Before destroying the election registers and declarations
of eligibility, the commissioner shall prepare records as
necessary to permit compliance with chapter 48A, subchapter V.
Nomination papers for primary election candidates for state and
county offices shall be destroyed ten days before the general
election, if a contest is not pending.
Sec. 11. Section 50.21, subsection 1, Code 2025, is amended
to read as follows:
1. The commissioner shall reconvene the election board of
the special precinct established by section 53.20 not earlier
than noon on the second day following each election which
is required by law to be canvassed on the Monday or Tuesday
following the election. If the second day following such an
election is a legal holiday the special precinct election board
may be convened at noon on the day following the election, and
if the canvass of the election is scheduled at any time earlier
than the Monday Tuesday following the election, the special
precinct election board shall be reconvened at noon on the day
following the election.
Sec. 12. Section 50.24, subsections 1 and 4, Code 2025, are
amended to read as follows:
1. The county board of supervisors shall meet to canvass
the vote on the first Monday or Tuesday after the day of
each election to which this chapter is applicable, unless
the law authorizing the election specifies another date for
the canvass. If that Monday or Tuesday is a public holiday,
section 4.1, subsection 34, controls.
4. For a regular or special city election or a city runoff
election, if the city is located in more than one county, the
controlling commissioner for that city under section 47.2 shall
conduct a second canvass on the second Monday or Tuesday after
the day of the election. However, if a recount is requested
pursuant to section 50.48, the controlling commissioner shall
conduct the second canvass within two business days after the
LSB 1413XD (4) 91
-4- ss/ns 4/9

S.F. _____ H.F. _____
conclusion of the recount proceedings. Each commissioner
conducting a canvass for the city pursuant to subsection 1
shall transmit abstracts for the offices and public measures of
that city to the controlling commissioner for that city, along
with individual tallies for each write-in candidate. At the
second canvass, the county board of supervisors of the county
of the controlling commissioner shall canvass the abstracts
received pursuant to this subsection and shall prepare a
combined city abstract stating the number of votes cast in the
city for each office and on each question on the ballot for
the city election. The combined city abstract shall further
indicate the name of each person who received votes for each
office on the ballot, the number of votes each person named
received for that office, and the number of votes for and
against each question submitted to the voters at the election.
The votes of all write-in candidates who each received less
than five percent of the total votes cast in the city for
an office shall be reported collectively under the heading
“scattering”.
Sec. 13. Section 50.24, subsection 5, paragraph a, Code
2025, is amended to read as follows:
a. For a regular or special school election, if the school
district is located in more than one county, the controlling
commissioner for that school district under section 47.2 shall
conduct a second canvass on the second Monday or Tuesday after
the day of election. However, if a recount is requested
pursuant to section 50.48, the controlling commissioner shall
conduct the second canvass within two business days after the
conclusion of the recount proceedings. Each commissioner
conducting a canvass for the school district pursuant to
subsection 1 shall transmit abstracts for the offices and
public measures of that school district to the controlling
commissioner for that school district, along with individual
tallies for each write-in candidate. At the second canvass the
county board of supervisors of the controlling county shall
LSB 1413XD (4) 91
-5- ss/ns 5/9

S.F. _____ H.F. _____
canvass the abstracts received pursuant to this subsection and
shall prepare a combined school district abstract stating the
number of votes cast in the school district for each office and
on each question on the ballot for the school election. The
combined school district abstract shall further indicate the
name of each person who received votes for each office on the
ballot, the number of votes each person named received for that
office, and the number of votes for and against each question
submitted to the voters at the election. The votes of all
write-in candidates who each received less than five percent of
the total votes cast in the school district for an office shall
be reported collectively under the heading “scattering”.
Sec. 14. Section 53.2, subsection 4, paragraph c, Code 2025,
is amended to read as follows:
c. For purposes of this subsection, “voter verification
number” means the registered voter’s driver’s license number or
nonoperator’s identification card number assigned to the voter
by the department of transportation or the registered voter’s
four-digit personal identification number assigned to the voter
by the state commissioner pursuant to section 47.7 48A.10A,
subsection 2 1.
Sec. 15. Section 53.10, subsection 2, paragraph b, Code
2025, is amended to read as follows:
b. For purposes of this subsection, “voter verification
number” means the registered voter’s driver’s license number or
nonoperator’s identification card number assigned to the voter
by the department of transportation or the registered voter’s
four-digit personal identification number assigned to the voter
by the state commissioner pursuant to section 47.7 48A.10A,
subsection 2 1.
Sec. 16. Section 53.23, subsection 3, paragraph a, Code
2025, is amended to read as follows:
a. The commissioner shall set the a convening time for the
board of no later than 9:00 a.m. on election day, allowing a
reasonable amount of time to complete counting all absentee
LSB 1413XD (4) 91
-6- ss/ns 6/9

S.F. _____ H.F. _____
ballots by 10:00 p.m. on election day.
Sec. 17. Section 54.5, subsection 3, Code 2025, is amended
to read as follows:
3. Each elector nominee and alternate elector nominee
of a political party or group of petitioners shall execute
the following pledge on a form prescribed by the state
commissioner, which shall accompany the submission of the
corresponding names to the state commissioner:
If selected for the position of elector, I agree to serve
and to mark my ballots for president and vice president for
the nominees for those offices of the party (or group of
petitioners) that nominated me.
Sec. 18. Section 260C.15, subsection 5, Code 2025, is
amended to read as follows:
5. The votes cast in the election shall be canvassed and
abstracts of the votes cast shall be certified as required by
section 277.20. In each county whose commissioner of elections
is the controlling commissioner for a merged area under section
47.2, the county board of supervisors shall convene on the
second Monday or Tuesday after the day of the election to
canvass the abstracts of votes cast from each county in the
merged area, and declare the results of the voting. The
commissioner shall at once issue certificates of election to
each person declared elected, and shall certify to the merged
area board in substantially the manner prescribed by section
50.27 the result of the voting on any public question submitted
to the voters of the merged area. Members elected to the board
of directors of a merged area shall qualify by taking the oath
of office prescribed in section 277.28.
Sec. 19. Section 384.19, subsection 1, Code 2025, is amended
to read as follows:
1. Within a period of ten days after the final date that
a budget or amended budget may be certified to the county
auditor, persons affected by the budget may file a written
protest with the county auditor specifying their objections
LSB 1413XD (4) 91
-7- ss/ns 7/9

S.F. _____ H.F. _____
to the budget or any part of it. A protest must be signed by
registered voters equal in number to one-fourth of one percent
of the votes cast for governor in the last preceding general
election in the city, but the number shall not be less than
ten persons and the number need not be more than one hundred
persons population of the city according to the most recent
federal decennial census or special census, whichever is later.
Sec. 20. REPEAL. Section 52.41, Code 2025, is repealed.